dict/pt_BR.aff
FLAG UTF-8
SFX e   0       ias          ler
SFX e   0       íeis         ler
SFX e   0       mos          ler
SFX e   er      ês           ler
SFX e   r       sse          ler
SFX e   er      êsseis       ler
SFX e   r       ssem         ler
SFX e   er      êssemos      ler
SFX e   r       sses         ler
SFX e   r       ste          ler
SFX e   r       stes         ler
SFX e   r       u            ler
SFX e   er      i            ler
SFX e   er      ia           ler
SFX e   er      iam          ler
SFX e   er      íamos        ler
SFX e   er      ias          ler
SFX e   er      ido          ler
SFX e   er      idos         ler
SFX e   er      ida          ler
SFX e   er      idas         ler
SFX e   er      íeis         ler
SFX e   ir      e            servir
SFX e   ir      em           servir
SFX e   ir      es           servir
SFX e   r       0            servir
SFX e   r       a            servir
SFX e   r       am           servir
SFX e   ir      íamos        servir
SFX e   r       as           servir
SFX e   r       do           servir
SFX e   r       dos          servir
SFX e   r       da           servir
SFX e   r       das          servir
SFX e   ir      íeis         servir
SFX e   r       mos          servir
SFX e   r       ndo          servir
SFX e   0       a            servir
SFX e   0       á            servir
SFX e   0       am           servir
SFX e   ir      íramos       servir
SFX e   0       ão           servir
SFX e   0       as           servir
SFX e   0       ás           servir
SFX e   0       des          servir
SFX e   0       ei           servir
SFX e   0       eis          servir
SFX e   ir      íreis        servir
SFX e   0       em           servir
SFX e   0       emos         servir
SFX e   0       es           servir
SFX e   0       ia           servir
SFX e   0       iam          servir
SFX e   0       íamos        servir
SFX e   0       ias          servir
SFX e   0       íeis         servir
SFX e   0       mos          servir
SFX e   r       s            servir
SFX e   r       sse          servir
SFX e   ir      ísseis       servir
SFX e   r       ssem         servir
SFX e   ir      íssemos      servir
SFX e   r       sses         servir
SFX e   r       ste          servir
SFX e   r       stes         servir
SFX e   r       u            servir
SFX e   ervir   irva         servir
SFX e   ervir   irvas        servir
SFX e   ervir   irvam        servir
SFX e   ervir   irvamos      servir
SFX e   ervir   irvais       servir
SFX e   ervir   irvo         servir
SFX e   r       0            saber
SFX e   r       i            saber
SFX e   r       is           saber
SFX e   r       m            saber
SFX e   r       mos          saber
SFX e   r       ndo          saber
SFX e   0       á            saber
SFX e   0       ão           saber
SFX e   0       ás           saber
SFX e   0       des          saber
SFX e   0       ei           saber
SFX e   0       eis          saber
SFX e   0       em           saber
SFX e   0       emos         saber
SFX e   0       es           saber
SFX e   0       ia           saber
SFX e   0       iam          saber
SFX e   0       íamos        saber
SFX e   0       ias          saber
SFX e   0       íeis         saber
SFX e   0       mos          saber
SFX e   r       s            saber
SFX e   er      ia           saber
SFX e   er      iam          saber
SFX e   er      íamos        saber
SFX e   er      ias          saber
SFX e   er      ida          saber
SFX e   er      idas         saber
SFX e   er      ido          saber
SFX e   er      idos         saber
SFX e   er      íeis         saber
SFX e   ber     iba          saber
SFX e   ber     ibais        saber
SFX e   ber     ibam         saber
SFX e   ber     ibamos       saber
SFX e   ber     ibas         saber
SFX e   aber    ei           saber
SFX e   aber    oube         saber
SFX e   aber    oubemos      saber
SFX e   aber    ouber        saber
SFX e   aber    oubera       saber
SFX e   aber    ouberam      saber
SFX e   aber    oubéramos    saber
SFX e   aber    ouberas      saber
SFX e   aber    ouberdes     saber
SFX e   aber    oubéreis     saber
SFX e   aber    ouberem      saber
SFX e   aber    ouberes      saber
SFX e   aber    oubermos     saber
SFX e   aber    oubesse      saber
SFX e   aber    oubésseis    saber
SFX e   aber    oubessem     saber
SFX e   aber    oubéssemos   saber
SFX e   aber    oubesses     saber
SFX e   aber    oubeste      saber
SFX e   aber    oubestes     saber
SFX e   der     ca           perder
SFX e   der     cais         perder
SFX e   der     cam          perder
SFX e   der     camos        perder
SFX e   der     cas          perder
SFX e   der     co           perder
SFX e   r       0            perder
SFX e   r       i            perder
SFX e   r       is           perder
SFX e   r       m            perder
SFX e   r       mos          perder
SFX e   r       ndo          perder
SFX e   0       a            perder
SFX e   0       á            perder
SFX e   0       am           perder
SFX e   er      êramos       perder
SFX e   0       ão           perder
SFX e   0       as           perder
SFX e   0       ás           perder
SFX e   0       des          perder
SFX e   0       ei           perder
SFX e   0       eis          perder
SFX e   er      êreis        perder
SFX e   0       em           perder
SFX e   0       emos         perder
SFX e   0       es           perder
SFX e   0       ia           perder
SFX e   0       iam          perder
SFX e   0       íamos        perder
SFX e   0       ias          perder
SFX e   0       íeis         perder
SFX e   0       mos          perder
SFX e   r       s            perder
SFX e   r       sse          perder
SFX e   er      êsseis       perder
SFX e   r       ssem         perder
SFX e   er      êssemos      perder
SFX e   r       sses         perder
SFX e   r       ste          perder
SFX e   r       stes         perder
SFX e   r       u            perder
SFX e   er      i            perder
SFX e   er      ia           perder
SFX e   er      iam          perder
SFX e   er      íamos        perder
SFX e   er      ias          perder
SFX e   er      ida          perder
SFX e   er      idas         perder
SFX e   er      ido          perder
SFX e   er      idos         perder
SFX e   er      íeis         perder
SFX e   rer     ira          requerer
SFX e   rer     irais        requerer
SFX e   rer     iram         requerer
SFX e   rer     iramos       requerer
SFX e   rer     iras         requerer
SFX e   rer     iro          requerer
SFX e   er      0            requerer
SFX e   er      ida          requerer
SFX e   er      idas         requerer
SFX e   er      ido          requerer
SFX e   er      idos         requerer
SFX e   r       i            requerer
SFX e   r       is           requerer
SFX e   r       m            requerer
SFX e   r       mos          requerer
SFX e   r       ndo          requerer
SFX e   0       a            requerer
SFX e   0       á            requerer
SFX e   0       am           requerer
SFX e   er      êramos       requerer
SFX e   0       ão           requerer
SFX e   0       as           requerer
SFX e   0       ás           requerer
SFX e   0       des          requerer
SFX e   0       ei           requerer
SFX e   0       eis          requerer
SFX e   er      êreis        requerer
SFX e   0       em           requerer
SFX e   0       emos         requerer
SFX e   0       es           requerer
SFX e   0       ia           requerer
SFX e   0       iam          requerer
SFX e   0       íamos        requerer
SFX e   0       ias          requerer
SFX e   0       íeis         requerer
SFX e   0       mos          requerer
SFX e   r       s            requerer
SFX e   r       sse          requerer
SFX e   er      êsseis       requerer
SFX e   r       ssem         requerer
SFX e   er      êssemos      requerer
SFX e   r       sses         requerer
SFX e   r       ste          requerer
SFX e   r       stes         requerer
