dict/pt_BR.dic
acendear/ejLMoY
acostumear/ejLMoY
ademenear/ejLMoY
afelear/ejLMoY
afoguear/ejLMoYÂ
agraudar/ejLMoY
ajudear/ejLMoY
alborear/ejLMoY
alertear/ejLMoY
algurandear/ejLMoY
almarear/ejLMoY
altear/ejLMoY
amear/ejLMoYÂ
anovear/ejLMoY
apartear/ejLMoY
aporrear/ejLMoY
arpear/ejLMoY
arrecear/ejLMoY
asnear/ejLMoYÂ
assear/ejLMoYÂ
aturrear/ejLMoY
babosear/ejLMoY
baguear/ejLoY
balanguear/ejLMoY
balear/ejLoY
bambear/ejLMoY
bandear/ejLMoYòÓ
banquetear/ejLMoYò
barafundear/ejLMoY
bargantear/ejLMoY
barranquear/ejLMoY
barrotear/ejLMoY
bastear/ejLMoY
batotear/ejLMoY
benevolear/ejLMoY
binuclear/ejLoY
bizarrear/ejLMoY
bofetear/ejLMoYò
bolichear/ejLMoY
bonsear/ejLMoY
bornear/ejLMoY
bracear/ejLMoYÓ
brandear/ejLMoY
bravatear/ejLMoY
brigadear/ejLMoY
brutear/ejLMoY
bufonear/ejLMoY
cabacear/ejLMoY
cabrapear/ejLMoY
cabritear/ejLMoY
cacear/ejLMoY
cachimbear/ejLMoY
calacear/ejLMoY
calcorrear/ejLMoY
calotear/ejLoY
cambitear/ejLMoY
camperear/ejLMoY
canear/ejLMoY
cantear/ejLMoYÀÂ
capenguear/ejLoY
carabinear/ejLMoY
carchear/ejLMoY
cargosear/ejLMoY
carnear/ejLoY
carranquear/ejLMoY
cartear/ejLoY
casear/ejLoYò
castanhetear/ejLMoY
catarrear/ejLMoY
cavaquear/ejLoY
celeumear/ejLMoY
chalacear/ejLMoY
champirrear/ejLMoY
chanquear/ejLMoY
chargear/ejLMoY
charutear/ejLMoY
chavetear/ejLMoY
chicotear/ejLoY
chimbear/ejLMoY
chispear/ejLoY
chuchurrear/ejLMoY
chumear/ejLMoY
cigarrear/ejLMoY
clarear/ejLMoYò
codinomear/ejLoY
colear/ejLoY
colubrear/ejLMoY
conchear/ejLMoYò
contrastear/ejLMoY
cordovear/ejLMoY
correar/ejLMoY
coscosear/ejLMoY
courear/ejLMoY
craquear/ejLMoY
cumprimentear/ejLMoY
curvetear/ejLMoY
debloquear/ejLMoY
delinear/ejLMoYÀì
derretear/ejLMoY
desfear/ejLoY
desmastear/ejLMoY
devanear/ejLMoY
donear/ejLMoY
efumear/ejLMoY
emargear/ejLMoY
embarrear/ejLMoY
embranquear/ejLMoY
emelear/ejLMoY
empavear/ejLMoY
empestear/ejLMoY
encadear/ejLMoYÀÂ
enclarear/ejLMoY
enfarear/ejLMoY
enfranquear/ejLMoY
engalhardear/ejLMoY
enlamear/ejLoYÂ
enramear/ejLMoY
ensenhorear/ejLMoY
entear/ejLMoY
entronear/ejLMoY
enxamear/ejLoYÂ
esbombardear/ejLMoY
esbravear/ejLMoY
escafedear/ejLMoY
escancear/ejLMoY
escaquear/ejLMoY
escardear/ejLMoY
escarpear/ejLMoY
escassear/ejLMoY
escopetear/ejLMoY
escramear/ejLMoYÀ
esfachear/ejLMoY
esfolhear/ejLMoY
esgaravatear/ejLMoY
esgravatear/ejLMoY
esmeraldear/ejLMoY
espaldear/ejLMoY
espingardear/ejLMoY
esporear/ejLMoY
esquerdear/ejLMoY
estar/ejLMoYË
estocadear/ejLMoY
estourear/ejLMoY
estrondear/ejLMoY
facear/ejLMoYÍ
falquear/ejLMoY
fanfarrear/ejLMoY
farfantear/ejLMoY
farronfear/ejLMoY
farsolear/ejLMoY
faxear/ejLMoY
filetear/ejLMoY
florear/ejLMoY
foquear/ejLMoY
fosquear/ejLMoY
francear/ejLMoY
frear/ejLMoYÀÂ
fumacear/ejLMoY
galanear/ejLMoY
gambetear/ejLoY
gargalhear/ejLMoY
garrulear/ejLMoY
gazear/ejLMoY
ginetear/ejLoY
grampear/ejLMoY
graxear/ejLMoY
gulosear/ejLMoY
incendiar/ejLoY
jiboiar/ejLMoY
lajear/ejLMoYÂ
lancetear/ejLMoY
laspear/ejLMoY
lerdear/ejLMoY
louquear/ejLMoYÀ
madrecear/ejLMoY
mamparrear/ejLoY
manotear/ejLMoY
marchantear/ejLMoY
mascatear/ejLoY
mear/2ejLoYÀÂÍ
milhear/ejLMoY
mocozear/ejLMoY
moquetear/ejLMoY
murear/ejLMoY
nordestear/ejLMoYò
ombrear/ejLMoY
pactear/ejLMoY
palestrear/ejLMoY
pandear/ejLMoY
parabentear/ejLMoY
parear/ejLMoY
passagear/ejLMoY
patentear/ejLMoY
pear/ejLoYÂ
peludear/ejLMoY
perfolhear/ejLoY
perrear/ejLMoYò
petequear/ejLMoY
pinguelear/ejLMoY
pirracear/ejLMoY
plaquear/ejLMoY
poltronear/ejLMoY
porretear/ejLMoY
prantear/ejLMoY
presentear/ejLoYÀ
protesear/ejLMoY
putear/ejLoY
rabunear/ejLMoY
raposear/ejLMoY
rebanear/ejLoY
redomonear/ejLoY
relumear/ejLMoY
resmonear/ejLMoY
roldear/ejLMoY
rosetear/ejLMoY
sabadear/ejLMoY
salamear/ejLMoY
saquear/ejLMoY
saudar/ejLoYÀÂ
serpentear/ejLMoY
sobressemear/ejLMoY
sopapear/ejLMoY
sortear/ejLMoYÂ
sussurrear/ejLMoY
talonear/ejLMoY
taramelear/ejLMoY
tartufear/ejLMoY
tempestear/ejLMoY
tiquetaquear/ejLMoY
tombear/ejLMoY
tourear/ejLMoY
tranquear/ejLMoY
trasvoltear/ejLMoY
tresler/ejLMo
trompear/ejLMoY
tunantear/ejLMoY
vadear/ejLoY
valsear/ejLMoY
velear/ejLoY
vermutear/ejLMoY
volutear/ejLMoYÀ
zangarrear/ejLMoY
zonzear/ejLMoY
